District of Columbia statutes.
42-3609

Availability of other remedies.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not limit the availability of other remedies under law or other equitable relief whether or not an adequate remedy exists at law.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1310, 47 DCR 6308

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1310 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1310 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).